Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Auditing

6.360.
Renumbered as KRS 7.310.

6.365.
Legislative audit committee — Appointment — Terms — Compensation. [Repealed.]

6.370.
Renumbered as KRS 7.320.

6.375.
Legislative auditor — Qualifications — Appointment — Removal — Bond. [Repealed.]

6.380.
Renumbered as KRS 7.330.

6.385.
Legislative auditor and employes — Limitations on activities — Compensation. [Repealed.]

6.390.
Renumbered as KRS 7.340.

6.395.
Renumbered as KRS 7.350.

6.400.
Recommendations of legislative auditor — Limitations. [Repealed.]

6.405.
Renumbered as KRS 7.360.

6.410.
Renumbered as KRS 7.370.

6.415.
Renumbered as KRS 7.380.